District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1702

Distraint of personal property — Authority to levy and sell; report and audit; disposition of surplus.

Repealed.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 673, ch. 690, title I, § 2
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 18(b), 34 DCR 850
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 41(a), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1702.
1973 Ed., § 47-1402.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”